West Virginia, session 2026, HB5661.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-12a. Medicaid program; dental care. (a) The following terms are defined:(1) "Cosmetic services" means dental work that improves the appearance of the teeth, gums, or bite, including, but not limited to, inlays or onlays, composite bonding, dental veneers, teeth whitening, or braces. (2) "Diagnostic and preventative services" means dental work that maintains good oral health and includes oral evaluations, routine cleanings, x-rays, fluoride treatment, fillings, and extractions.	(3) "Restorative services" means dental work that involves tooth replacement, including, but not limited to, dentures, dental implants, bridges, crowns, or corrective procedures such as root canals.(b) The Department of Human Services shall extend Medicaid coverage to adults aged 21 and over covered by the Medicaid program for diagnostic and preventative dental services and restorative dental services, excluding cosmetic services. This coverage is limited to $2,000 per two-year budget period. Recipients must pay for services over the  $2,000 limit.  No provision in this section shall restrict the department in exercising new options provided by, or to be in compliance with, new federal legislation that further expands eligibility for dental care for adult recipients.(c) The department is responsible for the implementation of, and program design for, a dental care system to reduce the continuing harm and continuing impact on the health care system in West Virginia. The dental health system design shall include oversight, quality assurance measures, case management, and patient outreach activities. The department shall assume responsibility for claims processing in accordance with established fee schedules and financial aspects of the program necessary to receive available federal dollars and to meet federal rules and regulations. The department shall seek authority from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to implement the provisions of this section.(d)  On or before December 1, 2027, the Bureau for Medical Services shall file a report with the Legislative Oversight Commission on Health and Human Resources Accountability and the Joint Committee on Government and Finance analyzing Medicaid expenditures related solely to the dental program for the plan year immediately prior to the passage of this legislation and each plan year until the date of submission of the required report.  The report shall include at a minimum an analysis of the enrollees served, the state share of the Medicaid expenditures, and the federal share of expenditures.(e) On December 1, 2028, the Bureau for Medical Services shall increase dental-related fees by at least 20 percent.